Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1126
United States Savings Bond; payroll deduction; procedure.

At such time as the State of Nebraska shall adopt for its state government centralized accounting and payroll systems, and following a determination by the Governor that costs of administering a United States Savings Bond withholding program shall not exceed ten thousand dollars annually, any official or employee of the State of Nebraska may authorize, in writing, the withholding from each pay period salary of a designated sum of not less than one dollar and twenty-five cents, or multiples thereof, for the purpose of purchasing United States Savings Bonds. The administrator of sections 81-1126 to 81-1129, to be designated by the Governor, having responsibility and authority for preparation of payrolls, shall upon receipt of such authorization for withholding, withhold such sum from the salary or compensation of such officer or employee for the period and in the amount stated in the authorization.

Laws 1965, c. 542, § 1, p. 1728;

Laws 1975, LB 448, § 1.